Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1318.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1402(a) and (a.1) of Title 8 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 1402. Regulation of contracts.(a) Requirements.--All contracts or purchases in excess of the base amount of [$18,500] $100,000, subject to adjustment under subsection (a.2), except those mentioned in this section 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 and except as provided by the act of October 27, 1979 (P.L.241, No.78), entitled "An act authorizing political subdivisions, municipality authorities and transportation authorities to enter into contracts for the purchase of goods and the sale of real and personal property where no bids are received," shall not be made except with and from the lowest qualified and responsible bidder after due notice in one newspaper of general circulation, at least two times at intervals of not less than three days where daily newspapers of general circulation are available for publication and, in case of weekly newspapers, notice once a week for two successive weeks. The first advertisement shall be published not more than 45 days and the second advertisement not less than ten days prior to the date fixed for the opening of bids. Advertisements for contracts or purchases must also be posted in a conspicuous place within the borough. Advertisements for contracts and purchases must contain the date, time and location for opening of bids and must state the amount of the performance bond determined under subsection (c). The amount of the contract must in all cases, whether of straight sale price, conditional sale, lease, lease purchase or otherwise, be the entire amount which the borough pays to the successful bidder or the bidder's assigns in order to obtain the services or property, or both, and may not be construed to mean only the amount that is paid to acquire title or to receive another particular benefit of the whole bargain.(a.1) Price quotations.--Written or telephonic price quotations from at least three qualified and responsible contractors must be requested for contracts in excess of the base amount of [$10,000] $50,000, subject to adjustment under subsection (a.2), and less than the amount requiring 20260SB1318PN1673 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 advertisement and competitive bidding, or, in lieu of price quotations, a memorandum must be kept on file showing that fewer than three qualified contractors exist in the market area within which it is practicable to obtain quotations. A written record of telephonic price quotations must be made and must contain at least the date of the quotation, the name of the contractor and the contractor's representative, the construction, reconstruction, repair, maintenance or work that was the subject of the quotation and the price. Written price quotations, written records of telephonic price quotations and memoranda must be retained for a period of three years. Written price quotations as used throughout this section include electronic mail.* * *Section 2. Sections 11901.1, 11901.2, 11901.4(a) and (b) introductory paragraph, 11902(1), 11903.1 introductory paragraph and 11909(1) of Title 11 are amended to read:§ 11901.1. Contracts or purchases in excess of certain base amount [of $18,500].(a) General rule.--Except as provided in section 11901.4(b) (relating to contracts or purchases not requiring advertising or bidding), all contracts or purchases in excess of the base amount of [$18,500] $100,000, subject to adjustment under section 11903.1 (relating to adjustments to base amount based on Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers), shall be subject to advertising and competitive bidding as provided in this chapter.(b) Contract.--All services and personal property required by any city municipal department, where the amount exceeds the base amount of [$18,500] $100,000, subject to adjustment under 20260SB1318PN1673 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 11903.1, shall be furnished and performed under written contract. The contract shall be awarded and given to the lowest responsible bidder after advertising two times, each publication on a different day, in not more than two newspapers of general circulation, in accordance with the provisions of section 10109 (relating to publication of notices). The bids shall not be opened until at least 10 days have elapsed after the first advertisement is published. A copy of the advertisement for contracts or purchases shall be posted in the city office designated by council.§ 11901.2. Contracts or purchases not in excess of certain base amount [of $18,500].With regard to all contracts or purchases not in excess of the base amount of [$18,500] $100,000, subject to adjustment under section 11903.1 (relating to adjustments to base amount based on Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers), the following shall apply:(1) The purchases or contracts shall be evidenced by note or memorandum in writing, signed by the officer or employee making the purchase or contract.(2) Council, or the officer designated by council, shall approve all purchases or contracts, except council need not approve those purchases or contracts within the category of small or routine purchases or incidental expenses, as defined by ordinance.§ 11901.4. Contracts or purchases not requiring advertising or bidding.(a) Not in excess of base amount.--City contracts or purchases, if not in excess of the base amount of [$18,500] $100,000, subject to adjustment under section 11903.1 (relating 20260SB1318PN1673 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to adjustments to base amount based on Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers), shall not require advertising or bidding.(b) In excess of base amount.--The following city contracts or purchases involving an expenditure over the base amount of [$18,500] $100,000, subject to adjustment under section 11903.1, do not require advertising or bidding:* * *§ 11902. Evasion of advertising requirements.The following shall apply:(1) No elected or appointed official or officials of any city shall evade the provisions of this chapter requiring advertising for bids by purchasing or contracting for services and personal property piecemeal for the purpose of obtaining prices under the base amount of [$18,500] $100,000, subject to adjustment under section 11903.1 (relating to adjustments to base amount based on Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers), upon transactions which should, in the exercise of reasonable discretion and prudence, be conducted as one transaction amounting to more than the base amount of [$18,500] $100,000, subject to adjustment under section 11903.1.* * *§ 11903.1. Adjustments to base amount based on Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers.Adjustments to the base amounts specified under sections 11901.1 (relating to contracts or purchases in excess of certain base amount [of $18,500]), 11902 (relating to evasion of advertising requirements) and 11909 (relating to separate bids for plumbing, heating, ventilating and electrical work, elevators and escalators) shall be made as follows:20260SB1318PN1673 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *§ 11909. Separate bids for plumbing, heating, ventilating and electrical work, elevators and escalators.The following shall apply:(1) In the preparation of specifications for the erection, construction and alteration of any public building, when the entire cost of the work shall exceed the base amount of [$18,500] $100,000, subject to adjustment under section 11903.1 (relating to adjustments to base amount based on Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers), the architect, engineer or other person preparing the specifications shall prepare only the following separate specifications:(i) Plumbing.(ii) Heating.(iii) Ventilating.(iv) Electrical work.(v) Elevators and escalators.(vi) One complete set of specifications for all the other work to be done in the erection, construction and alteration.* * *Section 3. Sections 2308(a), 2311(a), 2312, 5511(a)(1), (b) and (c) and 5614(a)(1), (b) and (c) of Title 53 are amended to read:§ 2308. Bids for certain joint purchases.(a) Notice.--All joint purchases involving an expenditure of more than a base amount of [$18,500] $100,000, subject to adjustment under subsection (b), shall be made by contract, in writing, only after notice for bids once a week for two weeks in at least one and not more than two newspapers of general 20260SB1318PN1673 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 circulation in the joining local governments. All contracts shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder. Every contract for the construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, improvement or maintenance of public works shall comply with the provisions of the act of March 3, 1978 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Steel Products Procurement Act.* * *§ 2311. Written or telephonic price quotations required.(a) Amount.--Written or telephonic price quotations from at least three qualified and responsible contractors shall be requested for all contracts in excess of the base amount of [$10,000] $50,000, subject to adjustment under subsection (b), but are less than the amount requiring advertisement and competitive bidding, or, in lieu of price quotations, a memorandum shall be kept on file showing that fewer than three qualified contractors exist in the market area within which it is practicable to obtain quotations. A written record of telephonic price quotations shall be made and shall contain at least the date of the quotation, the name of the contractor and the contractor's representative, the construction, reconstruction, repair, maintenance or work which was the subject of the quotation and the price, written price quotations, written records of telephonic price quotations, and memoranda shall be retained for a period of three years.* * *§ 2312. Division of transactions provided.No local government shall evade the provisions of section 2308 (relating to bids for certain joint purchases) as to advertising for bids or purchasing materials or contracting for services piecemeal for the purpose of obtaining prices under a 20260SB1318PN1673 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 base amount of [$18,500] $100,000, subject to adjustment under section 2308(b), upon transactions which should in the exercise of reasonable discretion and prudence be conducted as one transaction amounting to more than a base amount of [$18,500] $100,000, subject to adjustment under section 2308(b). This provision is intended to make unlawful the practice of evading advertising requirements by making a series of purchases or contracts each for less than the advertising requirement price or by making several simultaneous purchases or contracts each below such price when in either case the transaction involved should have been made as one transaction for one price.§ 5511. Competition in award of contracts.(a) Services.--(1) Except as set forth in paragraph (2), all construction, reconstruction, repair or work of any nature made by an authority if the entire cost, value or amount, including labor and materials, exceeds [$25,000] $100,000 shall be done only under contract to be entered into by the authority with the lowest responsible bidder upon proper terms after public notice asking for competitive bids as provided in this section.* * *(b) Supplies and materials.--All supplies and materials costing at least [$25,000] $100,000 shall be purchased only after advertisement as provided in this section. The authority shall accept the lowest bid, kind, quality and material being equal, but the authority shall have the right to reject any or all bids or select a single item from any bid. The provisions as to bidding shall not apply to the purchase of patented and manufactured products offered for sale in a noncompetitive 20260SB1318PN1673 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 market or solely by a manufacturer's authorized dealer.(c) Quotations.--Written or telephonic price quotations from at least three qualified and responsible contractors shall be requested for a contract in excess of the base amount of [$10,000] $50,000, subject to adjustment under subsection (c.1), but is less than the amount requiring advertisement and competitive bidding. In lieu of price quotations, a memorandum shall be kept on file showing that fewer than three qualified contractors exist in the market area within which it is practicable to obtain quotations. A written record of telephonic price quotations shall be made and shall contain at least the date of the quotation; the name of the contractor and the contractor's representative; the construction, reconstruction, repair, maintenance or work which was the subject of the quotation; and the price. Written price quotations, written records of telephonic price quotations and memoranda shall be retained for a period of three years.* * *§ 5614. Competition in award of contracts.(a) Services.--(1) Except as set forth in paragraph (2), all construction, reconstruction, repair or work of any nature made by an authority if the entire cost, value or amount, including labor and materials, exceeds a base amount of [$18,500] $100,000, subject to adjustment under subsection (c.1), shall be done only under contract to be entered into by the authority with the lowest responsible bidder upon proper terms after public notice asking for competitive bids as provided in this section.* * *20260SB1318PN1673 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Supplies and materials.--All supplies and materials with a base price costing at least [$18,500] $100,000, subject to adjustment under subsection (c.1), shall be purchased only after advertisement as provided in this section. The authority shall accept the lowest bid, kind, quality and material being equal, but the authority shall have the right to reject any or all bids or select a single item from any bid. The provisions as to bidding shall not apply to the purchase of patented and manufactured products offered for sale in a noncompetitive market or solely by a manufacturer's authorized dealer.(c) Quotations.--Written or telephonic price quotations from at least three qualified and responsible contractors shall be requested for a contract in excess of the base amount of [$10,000] $50,000, subject to adjustment under subsection (c.1), but is less than the amount requiring advertisement and competitive bidding. In lieu of price quotations, a memorandum shall be kept on file showing that fewer than three qualified contractors exist in the market area within which it is practicable to obtain quotations. A written record of telephonic price quotations shall be made and shall contain at least the date of the quotation; the name of the contractor and the contractor's representative; the construction, reconstruction, repair, maintenance or work which was the subject of the quotation; and the price. Written price quotations, written records of telephonic price quotations and memoranda shall be retained for a period of three years.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20260SB1318PN1673 - 10 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728